California statutes. Business and Professions Code
  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties [310. - 314.]

310.

The director shall have the following powers and it shall be his duty to:

(a) Recommend and propose the enactment of such legislation as necessary to protect and promote the interests of consumers.

(b) Represent the consumer’s interests before federal and state legislative hearings and executive commissions.

(c) Assist, advise, and cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies and officials to protect and promote the interests of consumers.

(d) Study, investigate, research, and analyze matters affecting the interests of consumers.

(e) Hold public hearings, subpoena witnesses, take testimony, compel the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence, and call upon other state agencies for information.

(f) Propose and assist in the creation and development of consumer education programs.

(g) Promote ethical standards of conduct for business and consumers and undertake activities to encourage public responsibility in the production, promotion, sale and lease of consumer goods and services.

(h) Advise the Governor and Legislature on all matters affecting the interests of consumers.

(i) Exercise and perform such other functions, powers and duties as may be deemed appropriate to protect and promote the interests of consumers as directed by the Governor or the Legislature.

(j) Maintain contact and liaison with consumer groups in California and nationally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

The director may create an interdepartmental committee to assist and advise him in the implementation of his duties. The members of such committee shall consist of the heads of state departments, or their designees. Members of such committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for the expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1394.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

(a) The director shall submit to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, a report of programmatic and statistical information regarding the activities of the department and its constituent entities for the previous fiscal year. The report shall include information concerning the director’s activities pursuant to Section 326, including the number and general patterns of consumer complaints and the action taken on those complaints.

 (b) The report shall include information relative to the performance of each constituent entity, including, but not limited to, length of time for a constituent entity to reach each of the following milestones
 in the enforcement process:

(1) Average number of days from when a constituent entity receives a complaint until the constituent entity assigns an investigator to the complaint.

(2) Average number of days from a constituent entity opening an investigation conducted by the constituent entity staff or the Division of Investigation to closing the investigation regardless of outcome.

(3) Average number of days from a constituent entity closing an investigation to imposing formal discipline.

(c) A report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 6.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

312.1.

The Office of Administrative Hearings shall submit a report to the department, the Governor, and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2016, and on or before January 1 of each subsequent year that includes, at a minimum, all of the following for the previous fiscal year:

(a) Number of cases referred by each constituent entity to each office of the Office of Administrative Hearings for a hearing.

(b) Average number of days from receiving a request to setting a hearing date at each office of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(c) Average number of days from setting a hearing to conducting the
 hearing.

(d) Average number of days after conducting a hearing to transmitting the proposed decision by each office of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 7.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

312.2.

(a) The Attorney General shall submit a report to the department, the Governor, and the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature on or before January 1, 2018, and on or before January 1 of each subsequent year that includes, at a minimum, all of the following for the previous fiscal year for each constituent entity within the department represented by the Licensing Section and Health Quality Enforcement Section of the Office of the Attorney General:

(1) The number of accusation matters referred to the Attorney General.

(2) The number of accusation matters rejected for filing by the Attorney General.

(3) The number of accusation matters for which further investigation was requested by the Attorney General.

(4) The number of accusation matters for which further investigation was received by the Attorney General. 

(5) The number of accusations filed by each constituent entity.

(6) The number of accusations a constituent entity withdraws. 

(7) The number of accusation matters adjudicated by the Attorney General.

(b) The Attorney General shall also report all of the following for accusation matters adjudicated within the previous fiscal year for each constituent entity of the department represented by the Licensing Section and
 Health Quality Enforcement Section: 

(1) The average number of days from the Attorney General receiving an accusation referral to when an accusation is filed by the constituent entity.

(2) The average number of days to prepare an accusation for a case that is rereferred to the Attorney General after further investigation is received by the Attorney General from a constituent entity or the Division of Investigation.

(3) The average number of days from an agency filing an accusation to the Attorney General transmitting a stipulated settlement to the constituent entity.

(4) The average number of days from an agency filing an accusation to the Attorney General transmitting a default decision to the constituent entity.

(5) The average number of days from an agency filing an accusation to the Attorney General requesting a hearing date from the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(6) The average number of days from the Attorney General’s receipt of a hearing date from the Office of Administrative Hearings to the commencement of a hearing.

(c) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.   (SB 467)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

The director shall provide for the establishment of a comprehensive library of books, documents, studies, and other materials relating to consumers and consumer problems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

313.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no rule or regulation, except those relating to examinations and qualifications for licensure, and no fee change proposed or promulgated by any of the boards, commissions, or committees within the department, shall take effect pending compliance with this section. 

(b) The director shall be formally notified of and shall be provided a full opportunity to review, in accordance with the requirements of Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and this section, all of the following:

(1) All notices of proposed action, any modifications and supplements thereto, and the text of proposed regulations.

(2) Any notices of sufficiently related changes to regulations previously noticed to the public, and the text of proposed regulations showing modifications to the text.

(3) Final rulemaking records.

(c) The submission of all notices and final rulemaking records to the director and the completion of the director’s review, as authorized by this section, shall be a precondition to the filing of any rule or regulation with the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall have no jurisdiction to review a rule or regulation subject to this section until after the completion of the director’s review and only then if the director has not disapproved it. The filing of any document with the Office of Administrative Law shall be accompanied by a certification that the board, commission, or committee has complied with the requirements of this section.

(d) Following the receipt of any final rulemaking record subject to subdivision (a), the director shall have the authority for a period of 30 days to disapprove a proposed rule or regulation on the ground that it is injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(e) Final rulemaking records shall be filed with the director within the one-year notice period specified in Section 11346.4 of the Government Code. If necessary for compliance with this section, the one-year notice period may be extended, as specified by this subdivision.

(1) In the event that the one-year notice period lapses during the director’s 30-day review period, or within 60 days following the notice of the director’s disapproval, it may be extended for a maximum of 90 days.

(2) If the director approves the final rulemaking record or declines to take action on it within 30 days, the board, commission, or committee shall have five days from the receipt of the record from the director within which to file it with the Office of Administrative Law.

(3) If the director disapproves a rule or regulation, it shall have no force or effect unless, within 60 days of the notice of disapproval, (A) the disapproval is overridden by a unanimous vote of the members of the board, commission, or committee, and (B) the board, commission, or committee files the final rulemaking record with the Office of Administrative Law in compliance with this section and the procedures required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the director from affirmatively approving a proposed rule, regulation, or fee change at any time within the 30-day period after it has been submitted to him or her, in which event it shall become effective upon compliance with this section and the procedures required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 13.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

313.2.

The director shall adopt regulations to implement, interpret, and make specific the provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act (P.L. 101-336), as they relate to the examination process for professional licensing and certification programs under the purview of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

313.5.

The director shall periodically publish a bibliography of consumer information available in the department library and elsewhere. Such bibliography shall be sent to subscribers upon payment of a reasonable fee therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

(a) The department or board shall not approve an accrediting entity that prohibits earn and learn programs for training in a profession licensed or certified by the board. A board shall use licensing or certification standards that authorize the use of earn and learn training.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department and its boards shall not be required to establish a mandate specifying an accrediting entity must provide earn and learn programs for training in a profession licensed or certified by a board.

(c) As used in this section,“earn and learn” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (q) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(d) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   (AB 1273)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.6. Uniform Standards Regarding Substance-Abusing Healing Arts Licensees [315. - 315.4.]

315.

(a) For the purpose of determining uniform standards that will be used by healing arts boards in dealing with substance-abusing licensees, there is established in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Substance Abuse Coordination Committee. The committee shall be comprised of the executive officers of the department’s healing arts boards established pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and a designee of the State Department of Health Care Services. The Director of Consumer Affairs shall chair the committee and may invite individuals or stakeholders who have particular expertise in the area of substance abuse to advise the committee.

(b) The committee shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) By January 1, 2010, the committee shall formulate uniform and specific standards in each of the following areas that each healing arts board shall use in dealing with substance-abusing licensees, whether or not a board chooses to have a formal diversion program:

(1) Specific requirements for a clinical diagnostic evaluation of the licensee, including, but not limited to, required qualifications for the providers evaluating the licensee.

(2) Specific requirements for the temporary removal of the licensee
 from practice, in order to enable the licensee to undergo the clinical diagnostic evaluation described in paragraph (1) and any treatment recommended by the evaluator described in paragraph (1) and approved by the board, and specific criteria that the licensee must meet before being permitted to return to practice on a full-time or part-time basis.

(3) Specific requirements that govern the ability of the licensing board to communicate with the licensee’s employer about the licensee’s status and condition.

(4) Standards governing all aspects of required testing, including, but not limited to, frequency of testing, randomness, method of notice to the licensee, number of hours between the provision of notice and the test, standards for specimen collectors, procedures used by
 specimen collectors, the permissible locations of testing, whether the collection process must be observed by the collector, backup testing requirements when the licensee is on vacation or otherwise unavailable for local testing, requirements for the laboratory that analyzes the specimens, and the required maximum timeframe from the test to the receipt of the result of the test.

(5) Standards governing all aspects of group meeting attendance requirements, including, but not limited to, required qualifications for group meeting facilitators, frequency of required meeting attendance, and methods of documenting and reporting attendance or nonattendance by licensees.

(6) Standards used in determining whether inpatient, outpatient, or other type of treatment is necessary.

(7) Worksite monitoring requirements and standards, including, but not limited to, required qualifications of worksite monitors, required methods of monitoring by worksite monitors, and required reporting by worksite monitors.

(8) Procedures to be followed when a licensee tests positive for a banned substance.

(9) Procedures to be followed when a licensee is confirmed to have ingested a banned substance.

(10) Specific consequences for major violations and minor violations. In particular, the committee shall consider the use of a “deferred prosecution” stipulation similar to the stipulation described in Section 1000 of the Penal Code, in which the licensee admits
 to self-abuse of drugs or alcohol and surrenders his or her license. That agreement is deferred by the agency unless or until the licensee commits a major violation, in which case it is revived and the license is surrendered.

(11) Criteria that a licensee must meet in order to petition for return to practice on a full-time basis.

(12) Criteria that a licensee must meet in order to petition for reinstatement of a full and unrestricted license.

(13) If a board uses a private-sector vendor that provides diversion services, standards for immediate reporting by the vendor to the board of any and all noncompliance with any term of the diversion contract or probation; standards for the vendor’s approval process for providers or
 contractors that provide diversion services, including, but not limited to, specimen collectors, group meeting facilitators, and worksite monitors; standards requiring the vendor to disapprove and discontinue the use of providers or contractors that fail to provide effective or timely diversion services; and standards for a licensee’s termination from the program and referral to enforcement.

(14) If a board uses a private-sector vendor that provides diversion services, the extent to which licensee participation in that program shall be kept confidential from the public.

(15) If a board uses a private-sector vendor that provides diversion services, a schedule for external independent audits of the vendor’s performance in adhering to the standards adopted by the committee.

(16) Measurable criteria and standards to determine whether each board’s method of dealing with substance-abusing licensees protects patients from harm and is effective in assisting its licensees in recovering from substance abuse in the long term.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, by January 1, 2019, the committee shall review the existing criteria for Uniform Standard #4 established pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c). The committee’s review and findings shall determine whether the existing criteria for Uniform Standard #4 should be updated to reflect recent developments in testing research and technology. The committee shall consider information from, but not limited to, the American Society of Addiction Medicine, and other sources of best
 practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

315.2.

(a) A board, as described in Section 315, shall order a licensee of the board to cease practice if the licensee tests positive for any substance that is prohibited under the terms of the licensee’s probation or diversion program.

(b) An order to cease practice under this section shall not be governed by the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) A cease practice order under this section shall not constitute disciplinary action.

(d) This section shall have no effect on the Board of Registered Nursing pursuant to Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 2770) of Chapter 6 of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 517, Sec. 2.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

315.4.

(a) A board, as described in Section 315, may adopt regulations authorizing the board to order a licensee on probation or in a diversion program to cease practice for major violations and when the board orders a licensee to undergo a clinical diagnostic evaluation pursuant to the uniform and specific standards adopted and authorized under Section 315.

(b) An order to cease practice under this section shall not be governed by the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) A cease practice order under this section shall not constitute disciplinary action.

(d) This section shall have no effect on the Board of Registered Nursing pursuant to Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 2770) of Chapter 6 of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 517, Sec. 3.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Representation of Consumers [320. - 321.]

320.

Whenever there is pending before any state commission, regulatory agency, department, or other state agency, or any state or federal court or agency, any matter or proceeding which the director finds may affect substantially the interests of consumers within California, the director, or the Attorney General, may intervene in such matter or proceeding in any appropriate manner to represent the interests of consumers. The director, or any officer or employee designated by the director for that purpose, or the Attorney General, may thereafter present to such agency, court, or department, in conformity with the rules of practice and procedure thereof, such evidence and argument as he shall determine to be necessary, for the effective protection of the interests of consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------

321.

Whenever it appears to the director that the interests of the consumers of this state are being damaged, or may be damaged, by any person who engaged in, or intends to engage in, any acts or practices in violation of any law of this state, or any federal law, the director or any officer or employee designated by the director, or the Attorney General, may commence legal proceedings in the appropriate forum to enjoin such acts or practices and may seek other appropriate relief on behalf of such consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1262.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Consumer Complaints [325. - 328.]

325.

It shall be the duty of the director to receive complaints from consumers concerning (a) unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices undertaken by any person in the conduct of any trade or commerce; (b) the production, distribution, sale, and lease of any goods and services undertaken by any person which may endanger the public health, safety, or welfare; (c) violations of provisions of this code relating to businesses and professions licensed by any agency of the department, and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto; (d) student concerns related to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education’s performance of its responsibilities, including concerns that arise related to the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education’s handling of a
 complaint or its administration of the Student Tuition Recovery Fund, established in Article 14 (commencing with Section 94923) of Chapter 8 of Part 59 of Division 10 of Title 3 of the Education Code; and (e) other matters consistent with the purposes of this chapter, whenever appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

325.3.

In addition to the duties prescribed by Section 325, it shall be the duty of the director to receive complaints from consumers concerning services provided by the entities described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 357, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

(a) Upon receipt of any complaint pursuant to Section 325, the director may notify the person against whom the complaint is made of the nature of the complaint and may request appropriate relief for the consumer.

(b) The director shall also transmit any valid complaint to the local, state or federal agency whose authority provides the most effective means to secure the relief.

The director shall, if appropriate, advise the consumer of the action taken on the complaint and of any other means which may be available to the consumer to
 secure relief.

(c) If the director receives a complaint or receives information from any source indicating a probable violation of any law, rule, or order of any regulatory agency of the state, or if a pattern of complaints from consumers develops, the director shall transmit any complaint he or she considers to be valid to any appropriate law enforcement or regulatory agency and any evidence or information he or she may have concerning the probable violation or pattern of complaints or request the Attorney General to undertake appropriate legal action. It shall be the continuing duty of the director to discern patterns of complaints and to ascertain the nature and extent of action taken with respect to the probable violations or pattern of complaints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

(a) In order to implement the Consumer Protection Enforcement Initiative of 2010, the director, through the Division of Investigation, shall implement “Complaint Prioritization Guidelines” for boards to utilize in prioritizing their respective complaint and investigative workloads. The guidelines shall be used to determine the referral of complaints to the division and those that are retained by the health care boards for investigation.

(b) Neither the Medical Board of California nor the Podiatric Medical Board of California shall be required to utilize the guidelines implemented pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) On
 or before July 1, 2019, the director shall amend the guidelines implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) to include the category of “allegations of serious harm to a minor” under the “urgent” or “highest priority” level.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 47.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Information [337. - 337.]

337.

(a) The Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Board of Psychology, the Medical Board of California, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall prepare and disseminate an informational brochure for victims of psychotherapist-client sexual behavior and sexual contact and their advocates. This brochure shall be developed by the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Board of Psychology, the Medical Board of California, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(b) The brochure shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) A legal and an informal definition of psychotherapist-client sexual behavior and sexual contact.

(2) A brief description of common personal reactions.

(3) A client’s bill of rights.

(4) Instructions for reporting psychotherapist-client sexual behavior and sexual contact.

(5) A full description of administrative complaint procedures.

(6) Information that other civil and criminal remedies may also be available to them in regards to the incident.

(7) A description of services available for support of victims.

(c) The brochure shall be provided to each individual contacting the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Board of Psychology, the Medical Board of California,
 or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California regarding a complaint involving psychotherapist-client sexual behavior and sexual contact.

(d) The brochure shall be made available on the Internet Web sites of the Board of Behavioral Sciences, the Board of Psychology, the Medical Board of California, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   (AB 2968)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Buildings of the Department [400. - 405.]

400.

The Department of Consumer Affairs may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, purchase or otherwise acquire real property and may construct and equip buildings and make improvements thereon for its use and the use of the boards and commissions comprising the department or subject to its jurisdiction and for the use of other departments, boards and agencies of the state, irrespective of the funds from which appropriations are made for their support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

When there is money in the fund of any board or commission comprising the Department of Consumer Affairs or subject to its jurisdiction, which money, the Director of Consumer Affairs finds, is not required to meet any demand which has accrued or may accrue against the fund, the Controller, upon executive order of the Director of Finance, shall transfer the sum designated by the Director of Consumer Affairs from the fund of the board or commission to the Consumer Affairs Fund to be used for the purposes of this chapter.

No money may be taken from the fund of any board or commission when it will interfere with the administrative duties imposed upon the board or commission. The unencumbered, unexpended money in the fund of any board in division number one of the department shall never be reduced to less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) by any transfer ordered by the Director of Consumer Affairs under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

The Department of Finance, from funds at its disposal for office and housing facilities for any other department, board, or agency, and any other department, board or agency, supported in whole or in part from the General Fund or special funds, may transfer in the manner authorized by law any money appropriated or made available for their use or investment to the Consumer Affairs Fund for expenditure by the Department of Consumer Affairs for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

Any building constructed by the Department of Consumer Affairs under this chapter shall be subject to the supervision of the Department of Consumer Affairs in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Department of Consumer Affairs and the Department of General Services.

The Department of Consumer Affairs may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, rent the space therein to any other department and to any board or agency for such rentals and upon such terms and conditions as the Department of Consumer Affairs deems fit.

The costs of operation, maintenance, repairs, and other reasonable and necessary expenses shall be paid from rentals. Thereafter, from such net rentals there shall be returned to the General Fund of the state and to such other funds from which contributions were made to the cost of the facilities, amounts commensurate with the financial requirements of the various funds from which contributions were made; the returnable amounts to be determined by the Department of Consumer Affairs, with the approval of the Department of General Services, and not to exceed the amount of the original contributions from the respective funds; provided, however, that interest may be paid on the contributions in the manner and amount determined by the Department of Consumer Affairs with the approval of the Director of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

The Department of Consumer Affairs and the Department of General Services may establish rules and regulations for the administration of any building constructed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

Rentals received under Section 403 shall be deposited in and disbursed pursuant to that section from the Consumer Affairs Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Public Members [450. - 453.]

450.

In addition to the qualifications provided in the respective chapters of this code, a public member or a lay member of any board shall not be, nor shall they have been within the period of five years immediately preceding their appointment, any of the following:

(a) An employer, or an officer, director, or substantially full-time representative of an employer or group of employers, of any
 licensee of a board, except that this subdivision shall not preclude the appointment of a person who maintains infrequent employer status with a licensee, or maintains a client, patient, or customer relationship with
 a licensee that does not constitute more than 2 percent of the practice or business of the licensee.

(b) A person maintaining a contractual relationship with a licensee of a board that would constitute more than 2 percent of the practice or business of the licensee, or an officer, director, or substantially full-time representative of that person or group of persons.

(c) An employee of a licensee of a board, or a representative of the employee, except that this subdivision shall not preclude the appointment of a person who maintains an infrequent employee relationship or
 renders professional or related services to a licensee if the employment or service does not constitute more than 2 percent of the employment or practice of the member of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 48.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

450.2.

In order to avoid a potential for a conflict of interest, a public member of a board shall not:

(a) Be a current or past licensee of that board.

(b) Be a close family member of a licensee of that board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

450.3.

No public member shall either at the time of their appointment or during their tenure in office have any financial interest in any organization subject to regulation by the board, commission, or committee of which they are a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 49.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

450.5.

A public member, or a lay member, at any time within five years immediately preceding his or her appointment, shall not have been engaged in pursuits which lie within the field of the industry or profession, or have provided representation to the industry or profession, regulated by the board of which he or she is a member, nor shall he or she engage in those pursuits or provide that representation during his or her term of office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

450.6.

Notwithstanding any other section of law, a public member may be appointed without regard to age so long as the public member has reached the age of majority prior to appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

If any board shall as a part of its functions delegate any duty or responsibility to be performed by a single member of such board, such delegation shall not be made solely to any public member or any lay member of the board in any of the following instances:

(a) The actual preparation of, the administration of, and the grading of, examinations.

(b) The inspection or investigation of licentiates, the manner or method of practice or doing business, or their place of practice or business.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as precluding a public member or a lay member from participating in the formation of policy relating to the scope of the activities set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) or in the approval, disapproval or modification of the action of its individual members, nor preclude such member from participating as a member of a subcommittee consisting of more than one member of the board in the performance of any duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2232.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

“Board,” as used in this chapter, includes a board, advisory board, commission, examining committee, committee or other similarly constituted body exercising powers under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

Every newly appointed board member shall, within one year of assuming office, complete a training and orientation program offered by the department regarding, among other things, his or her functions, responsibilities, and obligations as a member of a board. The department shall adopt regulations necessary to establish this training and orientation program and its content.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Licensee [460. - 464.]

460.

(a) No city, county, or city and county shall prohibit a person or group of persons, authorized by one of the agencies in the Department of Consumer Affairs or an entity established pursuant to this code by a license, certificate, or other means to engage in a particular business, from engaging in that business, occupation, or profession or any portion of that business, occupation, or profession.

(b) (1) No city, county, or city and county shall prohibit a healing arts professional licensed with the state under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or licensed or certified by an entity established pursuant to this code from engaging in any act or performing
 any procedure that falls within the professionally recognized scope of practice of that licensee.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit the enforcement of a local ordinance in effect prior to January 1, 2010, related to any act or procedure that falls within the professionally recognized scope of practice of a healing arts professional licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500).

(c) This section shall not be construed to prevent a city, county, or city and county from adopting or enforcing any local ordinance governing zoning, business licensing, or reasonable health and safety requirements for establishments or businesses of a healing arts professional licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or licensed or certified by an entity established
 under this code or a person or group of persons described in subdivision (a).

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit any city, county, or city and county from levying a business license tax solely for revenue purposes, nor any city or county from levying a license tax solely for the purpose of covering the cost of regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   (AB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

No public agency, state or local, shall, on an initial application form for any license, certificate or registration, ask for or require the applicant to reveal a record of arrest that did not result in a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere. A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

This section shall apply in the case of any license, certificate or registration provided for by any law of this state or local government, including, but not limited to, this code, the Corporations Code, the Education Code, and the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 883.)
-------------------------------------------

462.
